Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SPINAL CORD INJURY RESEARCH BOARD
SECTION 1. ORS 431A.500, 431A.505 and 431A.510 are repealed.
EMPLOYEE SUGGESTION AWARDS COMMISSION
SECTION 2. ORS 182.310, 182.320, 182.330 and 182.360 are repealed.
FAMILY SERVICES REVIEW COMMISSION
SECTION 3. ORS 411.075 is repealed.
SECTION 4.  ORS 409.162 is amended to read:
409.162. (1) The Department of Human Services shall collaborate with  its existing advisory
groups to identify and implement workload efficiencies in the state agencies that administer  pro-
grams providing:
(a) Child welfare services under ORS 418.005;
(b) Temporary assistance for needy families under ORS 412.006;
(c) Nutritional assistance under ORS 411.816;
(d) Medical assistance eligibility determinations under ORS 411.404;
(e) Services to elderly persons and to persons with disabilities under ORS 410.070 and 412.014;
and
(f) Vocational rehabilitation services under ORS 344.530.
(2) The department shall collaborate with the following  advisory groups and other groups des-
ignated by the department in identifying and implementing workload efficiencies:
(a) The advisory committee created by ORS 418.005 (2).
[(b) The Family Services Review Commission established under ORS 411.075. ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 1
[(c)] (b) The State Independent Living Council established by Executive Order 94-12.
[(d)] (c) The advisory committee established under ORS 344.735.
[(e)] (d) Area agency advisory councils required under ORS 410.210.
[(f)] (e) The Governor’s Commission on Senior Services created by ORS 410.320.
SECTION 5.  ORS 411.072 is amended to read:
411.072. (1) As used in this section “policy change” includes any  change in the operation of
public assistance programs that affects recipients  adversely in any substantial manner, including but
not limited  to the denial, reduction, modification or delay of benefits. “Policy change” does not in-
clude any procedural change that affects internal management  but does not adversely and substan-
tially affect the interest of public assistance recipients.
(2) The Department of Human Services  may submit applications for waiver of federal statutory
or regulatory requirements to the federal  government or any agency thereof. Prior to the submission
of any application for waiver that involves a policy change, and prior to  implementation, the de-
partment shall do the following:
(a) Conduct a public process regarding the waiver application or application for waiver  re-
newals;
(b) Prepare a complete summary of the testimony  and written comments received during the
public process;
(c) Submit the application for waiver or application for  waiver renewals involving a policy
change to the legislative  review agency, as described in ORS 291.375, and present the summary of
testimony and comments described in this section; and
(d) Give notice of  the date of its appearance before the Emergency Board[ ,] and the Joint In-
terim Committee on Ways and  Means or the Joint Committee on Ways and Means in accordance
with ORS 183.335[ , and before the Family Services Review Commission ].
SECTION 6.  ORS 411.093 is amended to read:
411.093. (1) All applicants for and recipients of public assistance shall be treated in a  courteous,
fair and dignified manner by Department of Human Services personnel.
(2) Any applicant or recipient who alleges discourteous, unfair or undignified treatment  by de-
partment personnel or alleges that incorrect or inadequate information regarding  public assistance
programs has been provided by department personnel may file a grievance with  the department. The
department shall publicize the grievance system in each local office.
(3) The grievance shall be discussed first  with the supervisor of the employee against whom the
grievance is filed. If the grievance is not resolved, the applicant or recipient may discuss  the
grievance with the local office manager.
(4) The department shall compile a monthly report summarizing each grievance  filed against
department personnel and the action taken. The report shall identify each grievance by local  office
and indicate the number of grievances filed against  individual employees. The report shall protect
the anonymity of department  personnel. The report shall be presented to [ the Family Services Review
Commission and to ] all county public welfare boards.
SECTION 7.  ORS 412.009 is amended to read:
412.009. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds that:
(a) There is evidence that families who experience the most disqualifications from the  job op-
portunity and basic skills program are often those with the most barriers to employment; and
(b) The loss of income from a program disqualification adds strain  and creates instability in
families already experiencing extreme poverty, and this affects the health and food  security of the
dependent children in the family.
(2) The Department of Human Services by rule shall  adopt proven methods of encouraging
participants’ full engagement in the job opportunity and basic skills program, including the devel-
opment of  an individualized case plan and an ongoing process to ensure that the case plan is ap-
propriate.
(3)(a) The department shall facilitate  the participation of needy caretaker relatives and may not
reduce the family’s aid payment as a method of encouraging full engagement in the job  opportunity
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 2
and basic skills program pursuant to  subsection (2) of this section until the department determines
that the needy caretaker relative that is not fully engaged:
(A) Has no identified barriers or refuses to take  appropriate steps to address identified barriers
to participation in the program; and
(B) Refuses without good cause, as defined  by the department by rule, to meet the requirements
of an individualized and appropriate case plan.
(b) The department may not reduce aid payments under this subsection to families:
(A) Receiving aid pursuant to ORS 412.014 or 412.124;
(B) In which  the caretaker relative participates in suitable activities for the number of hours
required each month to satisfy federally required participation rates; or
(C) Until  the department has screened for and, if appropriate, assessed barriers to participation,
including but not limited to physical or mental health needs, substance abuse, domestic  violence or
learning needs.
(c) The department may not reduce aid payments under this subsection before assessing  the risk
of harm posed to  the children in the household by the reduction in aid payments and taking steps
to ameliorate the risk.
(4) Following notice  and an opportunity for a hearing under ORS chapter 183 and subject to
subsection (2) of this section, the department may reduce the aid payment  to the family of an indi-
vidual who refuses to  participate in suitable activities required by the individual’s case plan or may
terminate the aid payment to the family of a noncompliant individual in  accordance with procedures
adopted by the department by rule.
(5) A caretaker relative may request a hearing to contest the basis for a reduction in or  termi-
nation of an aid payment under this section within 90 days of a reduction in or termination of aid.
[(6) Every six months, the department shall report to the Family Services Review Commission es-
tablished under ORS 411.075 the status of and outcomes for families for whom aid has  been reduced
or terminated  under subsection (4) of this section. The department shall work with the commission to
establish the details to be provided in the report. ]
JOBS PLUS ADVISORY BOARD
SECTION 8.
ORS 411.886 and 411.888 are repealed.
SECTION 9.  ORS 411.877 is amended to read:
411.877. As used in ORS 411.877 to 411.896:
[(1) “Board” means the JOBS Plus Advisory Board established in ORS 411.886. ]
[(2)] (1) “Job opportunities and basic skills program” means  the program described in ORS
412.009.
[(3)] (2) “JOBS Plus” or “program” means the JOBS Plus Program established in ORS 411.878.
[(4)] (3) “Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program” has the meaning given that term in ORS
411.806.
SECTION 10.  ORS 411.890 is amended to read:
411.890. A JOBS Plus Implementation Council shall be established in  service areas to be deter-
mined by the Director of Human Services to assist [ the JOBS Plus Advisory  Board and ] the De-
partment of Human Services in the administration of the JOBS Plus Program and  to allow local
flexibility in dealing with the particular needs of each county.  Each council shall be primarily re-
sponsible for recruiting and encouraging participation of employment providers in the  county. Each
council shall be  composed of seven members who shall be appointed by the county commissioners
in each county in the district.  Council members shall be residents of the district in which they are
appointed and shall serve four-year terms.  Six members of the council shall be from the local busi-
ness community. At least one member shall be a current or former recipient of the  temporary as-
sistance for needy families program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.
SECTION 11.  ORS 411.892 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 3
411.892. (1)(a) All employers, including public and private sector employers within the  State of
Oregon, are eligible to  participate in the JOBS Plus Program. The Department of Human Services
shall adopt by rule a method to  disqualify employers from participating in the program. No employer
is required to participate in the JOBS Plus Program. In the event  that there are unassigned par-
ticipants whom no employer desires to utilize, the participants may be assigned to work for a  public
agency.
(b) The maximum number of program participants that any employer is authorized  to receive
at any one time may not exceed 10 percent of the total number of  the employer’s employees.
However, each employer may receive one participant.  The Director of Human Services may waive
the limit in special circumstances.
(c) The Department of Human Services by rule shall establish criteria for excluding employers
from participation for failure to abide by program requirements, showing a pattern of  terminating
participants prior to the completion of training  or other demonstrated unwillingness to comply with
the stated intent of the program.
(2) The Department of Human Services shall ensure that jobs made available to  program par-
ticipants:
(a) Do not require work in excess of 40 hours per week;
(b) Are not used to displace  regular employees or to fill unfilled positions previously established;
and
(c) Do not pay a wage that is substantially less than the wage paid  for similar jobs in the local
economy with appropriate adjustments for experience and training.
(3)(a) Eligibility for the program shall be limited to residents who are:
(A) Adults and caretaker relatives who are receiving temporary  assistance for needy families
benefits;
(B) Adult  Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program recipients except as described in sub-
section (5)(b) of this section; and
(C) Unemployed noncaretaker parents of children who are receiving temporary  assistance for
needy families benefits.
(b) In addition to those residents eligible for the program  under paragraph (a) of this subsection,
additional residents who are seeking employment may be eligible for the program if there are
legislatively allocated funds available  in the temporary assistance for needy families budget of the
Department of Human Services.
(4)(a) Individuals desiring work through  the program shall contact the nearest Department of
Human Services office serving the county in which they reside if they are temporary assistance  for
needy families program or Supplemental  Nutrition Assistance Program applicants or recipients or
noncustodial parents of individuals receiving temporary assistance for needy families.
(b) With the assistance of the local JOBS Plus Implementation Councils [ and the JOBS Plus
Advisory Board ], the Department of Human Services shall develop a job inventory of sufficient  size
to accommodate all of the participants who desire to work  in the program. In consultation with the
participant,  the  department shall try to match the profile of each participant with the needs of an
employer when assigning a participant to work with the employer.
(c) Either  the employer or the participant may terminate the assignment by contacting the ap-
propriate Department of Human  Services office. In such event, the Department of Human Services
shall reassess the needs of the participant and assign the participant  to another JOBS Plus Program
placement or another job opportunity and basic skills program component and, at the employer’s
request, provide the employer with another participant.
(d)(A) If after  four months in a placement, a participant has not been hired for an unsubsidized
position, the employer shall allow the worker to undertake eight hours of job  search per week.
Participating employers shall consider such  time as hours worked for the purposes of paying wages.
(B) If after six months  in a placement, a participant has not been hired for an unsubsidized po-
sition, the placement shall be terminated, and the  caseworker shall reassess the participant’s em-
ployment development plan.
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 4
(e) The Department of Human Services may  pay placement and barrier removal payments to
temporary assistance for needy families program and Supplemental  Nutrition Assistance Program
participants as necessary to enable participation in the JOBS Plus Program.
(f) The Department of Human Services shall accept eligible volunteers into the program prior
to mandating program participation by eligible persons.
(5)(a) Assignment of participants to available  jobs shall be based on a preference schedule de-
veloped by the Department of Human Services.  Any temporary assistance for needy families recipi-
ent or supplemental nutrition assistance recipient may volunteer for the program.
(b) The following individuals may not be required to participate in the program:
(A) Recipients under the temporary  assistance for needy families program and the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program who are eligible for Supplemental Security Income  benefits or other
ongoing state or federal maintenance benefits based on age or disability.
(B) Supplemental nutrition  assistance applicants or recipients who are employed full-time or are
college students eligible for supplemental nutrition assistance  and enrolled full-time in a community
college  or  an institution of higher education, or enrolled half-time in a community college or an in-
stitution of higher education and working at least 20 hours per week.
(C) Teenage parents who remain in high school if  progressing toward a diploma. Teenage par-
ents not in school are eligible for the JOBS Plus Program.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall provide life skills classes and opportunities  to
achieve a certificate for passing an approved high school  equivalency test such as the General Ed-
ucational Development (GED) test to appropriate participants in  conjunction with working in the
JOBS Plus Program.
(d) Subject  to subsection (7) of this section, temporary assistance for needy families and sup-
plemental nutrition assistance shall be suspended at the end of  the calendar month in which an
employer makes the first wage payment to a  participant who is a custodial parent in a family that
receives temporary assistance for needy families or to any  adult member of a household receiving
supplemental nutrition assistance. Failure of the participant to cooperate with the requirements of
the JOBS Plus Program may result in  the participant’s removal, in accordance with rules adopted
by the Department of Human Services, from the JOBS Plus Program and suspension of  the
participant’s temporary assistance for needy families grant and supplemental  nutrition assistance.
A temporary assistance for  needy families and supplemental nutrition assistance recipient who has
been removed from the program for failing to cooperate shall be eligible  to reapply to participate
in the program and  shall have eligibility for program services determined without regard to the
length of time the person was not participating following removal.
(6)(a) Employers shall pay all participating individuals  at least the hourly rate of the Oregon
minimum wage.
(b) Sick leave, holiday and vacation absences shall conform to the individual employer’s rules
for temporary employees.
(c) Group health insurance  benefits shall be provided by the employer to program participants
if, and to the extent that, state or federal law requires the employer to provide such benefits.
(d) All persons participating in the JOBS  Plus Program shall be considered to be temporary
employees of the individual employer providing the work and shall  be entitled only to benefits re-
quired by state or federal law.
(e) Employers shall provide workers’ compensation coverage for each JOBS  Plus Program par-
ticipant.
(7) In the event that the net monthly full-time wage paid to a participant would be less than the
level of income from the temporary assistance for needy families program and the supplemental nu-
trition assistance amount equivalent that  the participant would otherwise receive, the Department
of Human Services shall determine and pay a supplemental payment as necessary  to provide the
participant with that level of net income. The department shall determine and  pay in advance sup-
plemental payments to participants  on a monthly basis as necessary to ensure equivalent net pro-
gram wages. Participants shall be compensated only for time worked.
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 5
(8) In addition to and not in lieu of the payments provided for under subsections (6) and  (7) of
this section, participants shall be entitled to retain the full child support  payments collected by the
Department of Justice.
(9) In conformity with existing  state day care program regulations, child day care shall be pro-
vided for all program participants who require it.
(10) JOBS Plus Program employers shall:
(a) Endeavor to make JOBS Plus Program placements positive learning and training experiences;
(b) Maintain health,  safety and working conditions at or above levels generally acceptable in the
industry and no less than that of comparable jobs of the employer;
(c) Provide on-the-job training to the degree necessary for the participants  to perform their du-
ties;
(d) Recruit volunteer mentors from among their regular employees to  assist the participants in
becoming oriented to work and the workplace; and
(e) Sign  an agreement to abide by all requirements of the program, including the requirement
that the program not supplant existing jobs. All agreements shall include provisions noting the
employer’s responsibility  to repay reimbursements in the event the employer violates program rules.
When a professional placement service, professional employment organization or temporary employ-
ment agency is acting as an employer pursuant to subsection (13) of this section, agreements  under
this paragraph shall require a three-party agreement between the professional placement  service,
professional employment organization or temporary employment agency, the organization  where the
participant has been  placed to perform services and the State of Oregon. The three-party agreement
shall include provisions requiring that all JOBS Plus reimbursements received by the  professional
placement service, professional employment organization or  temporary employment agency be cred-
ited to the organization where the participant has been placed to perform services.
(11) Program participant wages shall be subject  to federal and state income taxes, Social Secu-
rity taxes and unemployment insurance tax or reimbursement as applicable  under ORS chapter 657,
which shall be withheld and paid in accordance with state and federal  law. Supplemental payments
made pursuant to subsection (7) of this section shall not be subject  to state income taxes under ORS
chapter 316 and, to the extent allowed by federal law, shall not  be subject to federal income taxes
and Social Security taxes.
(12)(a) The Department of Human Services shall  reimburse employers for the employers’ share
of Social Security, unemployment insurance and  workers’ compensation premiums paid on behalf of
program participants referred  to the employer by the Department of Human Services, as well as the
minimum wage  earnings paid by the employer to program participants referred to the employer by
the Department of Human Services.
(b) If the Department of Human Services finds that an employer has  violated any of the rules
of the JOBS Plus Program, the department:
(A) Shall withhold any amounts due to employers under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(B) May seek repayment of any amounts paid to employers under paragraph (a) of this sub-
section.
(13) For  purposes of this section, “employer” shall include professional placement services, pro-
fessional employment organizations and temporary employment agencies.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 411.896 is amended to read:
411.896. The Department of Human Services shall submit an annual written report  to the Leg-
islative Assembly and the Governor containing a full and complete analysis of the JOBS Plus Pro-
gram. The report shall include recommendations [ from the department and the  JOBS Plus Advisory
Board] regarding appropriate revisions to the program.
POISON PREVENTION TASK FORCE
SECTION 13.
ORS 431A.300, 431A.303, 431A.305, 431A.308, 431A.310, 431A.313, 431A.315,
431A.318, 431A.320, 431A.323 and 431A.325 are repealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 6
SECTION 14.  ORS 442.870, as amended by section  27, chapter 32, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
442.870. (1) The Emergency Medical Services Enhancement Account is established  separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the account shall accrue to  the ac-
count. All moneys deposited in the account are continuously appropriated  to the Department of
Revenue for the purposes of this section.
(2) The Department  of Revenue shall distribute moneys in the Emergency Medical Services En-
hancement Account in the following manner:
(a) 35 percent of the moneys in the account shall be transferred to the  Office of Rural Health
established under ORS 442.475 for the purpose of enhancing emergency medical services in rural
areas as specified in ORS 442.507.
(b) 25 percent of the moneys in the account shall be transferred to the  Emergency Medical
Services Program established under section 2, chapter 32, Oregon Laws 2024.
(c) 35 percent of the moneys in the account shall be transferred  to the Area Health Education
Center program established under ORS 353.450.
(d) 5 percent of the moneys in the  account shall be transferred to the [ Oregon Poison Center
referred to in ORS 431A.313 ] Oregon Poison Center of the  Oregon Health and Science Univer-
sity.
MENTAL HEALTH ADVISORY BOARD AND
DISABILITY ISSUES ADVISORY COMMITTEE
SECTION 15.
ORS 430.050 is repealed.
SECTION 16.  ORS 430.631 is amended to read:
430.631. (1) As used in this section, “person with a disability” means any person who:
(a) Has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one  or more major life
activities;
(b) Has a record of such an impairment; or
(c) Is regarded as having such an impairment.
[(1)] (2) If any local mental health program has an advisory committee, persons with
disabilities[ , as defined in ORS 430.050 (6), ] and older adults shall  be appointed to serve on the ad-
visory committee.
[(2)] (3) The persons with disabilities serving on an advisory  committee  described in sub-
section [ (1)] (2) of this section shall meet separately as a disability issues advisory committee.
TASK FORCE ON RESOLUTION OF
ADVERSE HEALTH CARE INCIDENTS
SECTION 17.
ORS 31.280 is repealed.
SECTION 18.  ORS 31.276 is amended to read:
31.276. (1) The Oregon  Patient Safety Commission shall make rules establishing requirements
and procedures as necessary to implement ORS 31.260 to 31.278, including, but not limited to:
(a) Procedures for filing a notice of adverse health care  incident under ORS 31.262 and for
conducting discussions and mediations under ORS 31.264 and 31.268.
(b) The form of the notice of adverse health care incident under ORS 31.262.
(2) The commission shall use  notices of adverse health care incidents filed under ORS 31.262 to:
(a) Establish quality improvement techniques to reduce patient  care errors that contribute to
adverse health care incidents.
(b) Develop evidence-based prevention practices to improve patient outcomes and disseminate
information about those practices.
(c) Upon  the request of a health care facility or health care provider, assist the facility or pro-
vider in reducing the frequency of a particular adverse health care incident, including, but not lim-
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 7
ited to, determining the underlying cause of the incident and  providing advice regarding preventing
reoccurrence of the incident.
(3) The commission shall:
(a) Using aggregate, deidentified data, continuously evaluate the implementation  and ef-
fects of ORS 31.260 to 31.278; and
(b) Before  December 31 of each year, report on the implementation and effects of ORS
31.260 to 31.278 to an appropriate committee  or interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 19.
The unit captions  used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
Passed by Senate April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 47 (SB 47-A) Page 8